Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-253
Accounts; audit; meetings; notice.

The board shall meet at the town clerk's office or other convenient place for the purpose of examining and auditing the town accounts in each fiscal year at such times as the interest of the town may require. Notices of such meetings shall be published once at least ten days before such meeting in a legal newspaper of general circulation in the county.

Laws 1895, c. 28, § 52, p. 145;

Laws 1913, c. 257, § 1, p. 791;

R.S.1913, § 1037;

C.S.1922, § 939;

Laws 1923, c. 139, § 3, p. 342;

C.S.1929, § 26-253;

R.S.1943, § 23-253;

Laws 1965, c. 97, § 2, p. 416;

Laws 1965, c. 98, § 1, p. 417;

Laws 1973, LB 75, § 12.